test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-11kommwq_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kommõq: # Noun (11) kommõq 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kommõq+N+Sg+Nom: kommõq
     kommõq+N+Sg+Gen: kombõ
     kommõq+N+Sg+Par: kommõt
     kommõq+N+Sg+Ill: kombõhe
     kommõq+N+Sg+Ine: kombõn
     kommõq+N+Sg+Ela: kombõst
     kommõq+N+Sg+All: kombõlõ
     kommõq+N+Sg+Ade: kombõl
     kommõq+N+Sg+Abl: kombõlt
     kommõq+N+Sg+Tra: kombõs
     kommõq+N+Sg+Ter: kombõniq
     kommõq+N+Sg+Abe: kombõldaq
     kommõq+N+Sg+Com: kombõgaq
     kommõq+N+Pl+Nom: kombõq
     kommõq+N+Pl+Gen: kombidõ
     kommõq+N+Pl+Par: kombit
     kommõq+N+Pl+Ill: kombihe
     kommõq+N+Pl+Ine: kombin
     kommõq+N+Pl+Ela: kombist
     kommõq+N+Pl+All: kombilõ
     kommõq+N+Pl+Ade: kombil
     kommõq+N+Pl+Abl: kombilt
     kommõq+N+Pl+Tra: kombis
     kommõq+N+Pl+Ter: kombiniq
     kommõq+N+Pl+Abe: kombildaq
     kommõq+N+Pl+Com: kombidõgaq
